Hawaii statutes.
[§412:13-215] Representative office of
foreign banks; necessity of licensure. (a) No foreign bank shall
establish or maintain a Hawaii representative office unless the foreign bank is
licensed by the commissioner to maintain a Hawaii representative office.

(b) Nothing in subsection (a) shall be deemed
to prohibit a foreign bank which maintains a federal agency or federal branch
in this State from establishing or maintaining one or more Hawaii
representative offices. [L 1996, c 155, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next